Utah statutes.
31A-3-101.   General finance provisions.
(1)  The department's expenses shall be paid from the General Fund.
Department expenditures shall conform to the Legislature's appropriation
adopted under Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act.
(2)  Except as provided in Section 31A-2-206, or as otherwise specifically
provided in this title, all monies collected by the commissioner shall be
deposited without deduction in the General Fund.
